Mississippi, session 2026, SB2316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-37-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-37-31.  It shall be unlawful for any person, persons, corporation or manufacturing establishment * * *, not duly authorized under federal law, to make, manufacture, sell or possess any instrument or device which, if used on firearms of any kind, will arrest or muffle the report of the firearm when shot or fired if making, manufacturing, selling or possessing that instrument or device violates federal law.  Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned in the county jail not more than thirty (30) days, or both. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.